Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.61
Emergency management organizations; political activities prohibited.

No emergency management organization established under the Emergency Management Act shall participate in any form of political activity nor shall it be employed directly or indirectly for political purposes.

Laws 1951, c. 315, § 12, p. 1082;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-829.27;

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 26;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 41.